California statutes. Water Code
If an application is filed, and proceedings for the formation of the district are commenced and prosecuted, in the manner and within the time specified by this part, the inclusion within the boundaries of the proposed district of territory formed into a new city or annexed to an existing city, pursuant to proceedings which were not commenced by the filing of a valid petition prior to the approval of the application, shall not prevent or invalidate the formation of the district even though the remainder of the corporate area of the city is not included in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71078.

The inclusion within the boundaries of a proposed district of territory formed into a new city or annexed to an existing city, pursuant to proceedings which were not commenced by the filing of a valid petition prior to the filing of the formation petition, shall not prevent or invalidate the formation of the district even though the remainder of the corporate area of the city is not included in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71079.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, if, prior to the filing of a formation petition, any portion of the corporate area of a city is included within an existing municipal water district, a district may be formed pursuant to this division to include the remainder of the corporate area of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71080.

If, subsequent to the approval of an application which includes a portion of the corporate area of a city, but prior to the filing of the formation petition, such portion of the corporate area of the city is included within an existing municipal water district so that the entire corporate area of the city is included within such existing district, such portion of the corporate area of the city shall be omitted from the formation petition. Such omission shall not invalidate the approval of the application as to the remaining area of the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71081.

If, subsequent to the approval of an application of intention, but prior to circulating the formation petition, a valid petition is filed with, or a resolution is adopted by, the governing body of a city, the corporate area of which is included in a metropolitan water district organized under the Metropolitan Water District Act, to initiate formal proceedings for the annexation to the city of territory within the proposed municipal water district, in a manner which would result in automatic annexation to the metropolitan water district of the territory annexed to the city, the proponents of the formation of the municipal water district may omit from the proposed municipal water district all territory included in the petition or resolution for annexation. If such territory is omitted, no part of the city shall be included within the proposed municipal water district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Formation Petition [71120. - 71134.]

71120.

A petition for the formation of a district, which may consist of any number of separate instruments, shall be filed with the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 193.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71121.

The formation petition shall be signed by voters equal in number to at least 10 per centum of the voters registered within the boundaries of the proposed district 30 days prior to the date the petition is filed. If one or more cities are included in the proposed district, the formation petition shall, in addition, be signed by at least 10 percent of the voters of each such city registered to vote 30 days prior to the date the petition is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

71122.

If only a portion of the corporate area of a city is included within a proposed district, and 12 or more registered voters reside within such portion of the city, the formation petition shall be signed by voters residing within such portion equal in number to at least 10 percent of the total number of registered voters in such portion, or 10 percent of the number of voters of such portion voting for all candidates for the office of Governor at the last general election prior to the filing of the petition, whichever is the lesser number. If less than 12 registered voters reside within such portion of the city, the formation petition shall be signed by at least 50 percent of the voters residing in such portion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71123.

The formation petition shall describe the boundaries of the proposed district and shall contain a prayer that the proposed district be formed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71124.

Except as otherwise authorized in this part, the boundaries of the proposed district shall be described in the formation petition in the same manner as in the declaration of intention and shall include the same area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71125.

The circulation of a formation petition shall be commenced by the proponents within 30 days from the date of the filing of the declaration of intention with the county elections official. The petition shall be circulated and filed with the county elections official within 90 days from the date of the filing of the declaration of intention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 194.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71126.

Within 30 days of the date of the filing of the formation petition, the county elections official shall examine the petition and determine whether it is signed by the requisite number of voters. Upon request of the county elections official, the board of supervisors shall authorize him or her to employ persons specially for this purpose, in addition to the persons regularly employed in his or her office, and shall provide for their compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 195.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71127.

When the county elections official has completed the examination of the formation petition, he or she shall attach to it the certificate, properly dated, showing the result of the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 196.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71128.

If the county elections official finds from the examination that the formation petition is signed by the requisite number of voters residing within the boundaries of the proposed district, and within the boundaries of each city included therein, he or she shall certify that the petition is sufficient. If he or she finds that it is not so signed, he or she shall certify that the petition is insufficient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 197.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71129.

If the county elections official certifies in the certificate that the formation petition is insufficient, he or she shall also certify therein to the number of voters required to make the petition sufficient, and the petition may be amended by filing a supplemental petition or petitions within 10 days from the date of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 198.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71130.

Within 30 days after the filing of any supplemental petition or petitions, the county elections official shall examine them and certify to the result of the examination as provided in Sections 71126 to 71128, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71131.

If any supplemental petition is filed, all the signatures on the original and supplemental petitions shall be considered in determining the number of voters signing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71132.

After the time for filing supplemental petitions has expired and all supplemental petitions have been examined, if the county elections official’s certificate shows that the formation petition is insufficient, the petition shall be filed with the board of supervisors and kept as a public record, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 200.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71133.

If the county elections official’s certificate shows that the formation petition is sufficient, the county elections official shall present the petition to the board of supervisors without delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 201.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71134.

After an election for the formation of a proposed district, the sufficiency of the formation petition shall not be subject to judicial review or be otherwise questioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Formation Election [71160. - 71172.]

71160.

When a formation petition is presented to it, the board of supervisors shall make an order dividing the proposed district into five divisions in such manner as to equalize, as nearly as practicable, the population in the respective divisions. The board of supervisors shall use for this purpose the population as estimated by it from the register of voters used at the last general election.

The divisions of the district shall be numbered first, second, third, fourth, and fifth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71161.

When the order dividing the proposed district into five divisions is made, the board of supervisors shall by resolution or ordinance call and provide for the holding of an election in the proposed district for the purpose of determining whether the district shall be formed and to elect the first board of directors if the district is formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71162.

The formation election shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days from the date of adoption of the resolution or ordinance calling the election.

For purposes of this election the board of supervisors may consolidate election precincts of one or more divisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

71163.

Notice of the formation election shall be published once, not less than one week nor more than four weeks prior to the election, in at least one newspaper but not exceeding three newspapers, printed and published in each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71163.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

71163.2.

The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

71163.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

71163.4.

The officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 262.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71164.

The notice of the formation election shall contain the following:

(a) A description of the boundaries of the proposed district and its divisions.

(b) The name of the proposed district, which name shall contain the words “____ Municipal Water District.”

(c) A statement that the first directors will be elected at the election and will take office if the district is formed.

(d) The names of the candidates for the office of director for each of the divisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71165.

The following measure shall be submitted at the formation election:

“Shall the proposition to form the ____ Municipal Water District under the Municipal Water District Law of 1911 be adopted?”

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71166.

No person may vote at any formation election unless he is a voter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71167.

Within seven days after the formation election the board of supervisors shall canvass the vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71168.

If less than a majority of the votes cast in any affected county are in favor of the proposition, the formation of the district fails, but without prejudice to renewing proceedings at any time after six months from the date of the formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71169.

The first directors shall be elected at the formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71170.

One director shall be elected for each division by the voters of the division. Each director shall be a resident of the division for which he is elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71171.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, the candidates shall declare their candidacy and shall be nominated, the election shall be held and conducted, the vote canvassed, the result declared, and the certificates of election issued in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they may be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71172.

If a majority of the votes cast in each affected county at the formation election favor the formation of the district, each candidate for director who receives the highest number of votes in his division is elected as a director of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Establishment of District [71190. - 71196.]

71190.

If a majority of the votes cast in each affected county at the formation election favor the formation of the district, the board of supervisors shall, by an order entered on its minutes, declare the territory included within the proposed boundaries to be formed as a municipal water district under the designated name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71191.

The county clerk shall immediately cause to be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each affected county, a certificate stating that the proposition to form the district was adopted.

The county clerk shall immediately cause to be filed with the Secretary of State a certificate listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district organized contains all of the information required to be in the last-mentioned certificate, the clerk may file a copy of the order with the Secretary of State in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

71192.

Upon the receipt of the county clerk’s certificate, or a copy of the order declaring the district organized, the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, issue his certificate reciting that the municipal water district, naming it, has been duly incorporated according to the laws of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

71193.

A copy of the Secretary of State’s certificate shall be transmitted to and filed with the county clerk of each affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71194.

From and after the date of filing the county clerk’s certificate with the Secretary of State, the district named therein is incorporated as a municipal water district, with all the rights, privileges and powers set forth in this division, and necessarily incident thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71195.

No informality in any proceeding, or in the conduct of any election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall invalidate the incorporation of any municipal water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71196.

Any proceeding wherein the validity of the incorporation of a district is denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of the Secretary of State’s certificate of incorporation; otherwise the incorporation and legal existence of the district and all proceedings in respect thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. INTERNAL ORGANIZATION [71250. - 71365.]



  CHAPTER 1. Directors [71250. - 71256.]

71250.

The board of directors shall consist of five members. Each director shall be a resident of the division from which he is elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71250.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 71250, the local agency formation commission, in approving either a consolidation of districts or the reorganization of two or more districts into a single municipal water district may, pursuant to subdivisions (k) and (n) of Section 56886 of the Government Code, increase the number of directors to serve on the board of directors of the consolidated or reorganized district to 7, 9, or 11, who shall be members of the board of directors of the districts to be consolidated or reorganized as of the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization.

(b) Upon the expiration of the terms of the members of the board of directors of the consolidated district, or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a), whose terms first expire following the effective date of the consolidation or reorganization, the total number of members on the board of directors shall be reduced until the number equals the number of members permitted by the principal act of the consolidated or reorganized district, or any larger number as may be specified by the local agency formation commission in approving the consolidation or reorganization.

(c) In addition to the powers granted under Section 1780 of the Government Code, in the event of a vacancy on the board of directors of the consolidated district or a district reorganized as described in subdivision (a) at which time the total number of directors is greater than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(d) For the purposes of this section: “consolidation” means consolidation, as defined in Section 56030 of the Government Code; “district” or “special district” means district or special district, as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code; and “reorganization” means reorganization, as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 172, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

71250.5.

If a director moves his or her residence, as defined in Section 244 of the Government Code, outside the boundaries of that director’s division, and if within 180 days of the move or the effective date of this section, the director fails to reestablish a place of residence within the director’s division, it shall be presumed that a permanent change of residence has occurred and that a vacancy exists on the board of directors pursuant to Section 1770 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 91, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71251.

The directors elected at the formation election shall classify themselves by lot so that two of them shall hold office until the election and qualification of their successors at the first succeeding general district election and three of them shall hold office until the election and qualification of their successors at the second succeeding general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71252.

Each director elected subsequent to the formation election shall hold office for a term of four years from and after the date for his taking of office and until the election and qualification of his successor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71253.

Except for the directors elected at a formation election, directors elected to office shall take office at noon on the first Friday in December succeeding their election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 72)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

71254.

Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of director it shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code, by a qualified person, who shall be a resident of, and otherwise qualified to be a director from, the division in which the vacancy occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------

71255.

Each director shall receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of six days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties required or authorized by the board. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

71256.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law any person who represents a municipal water district on the board of directors of any metropolitan water district formed pursuant to the Metropolitan Water District Act may receive compensation and expenses from the municipal water district with respect to service on such board of directors of a metropolitan water district, in the same amount, and upon the same terms, as shall be provided with respect to service on the board of the district. Any compensation or expenses received pursuant to this section shall be in addition to that provided in Section 71255.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 303.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Three Valleys Municipal Water District [71260. - 71262.]

71260.

This chapter applies only to the Three Valleys Municipal Water District. Except as provided in this chapter, this division applies to the Three Valleys Municipal Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71261.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Board of Directors of the Three Valleys Municipal Water District shall consist of seven directors. Each director shall be a resident of the division from which he or she is elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71262.

The board shall establish the boundaries of the seven divisions from which directors are elected in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 71540) of Part 4. The additional directors shall be elected at a special district election which shall be called by the Board of Directors of Three Valleys Municipal Water District on the next available election date established by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 1 of the Elections Code that is 90 or more days after January 1, 1989. The two additional directors so elected and qualified shall take office on July 1, 1989, and shall hold office until their successors, who shall be elected at the district general election in 1992, take office. Thereafter, the two additional directors shall be elected to terms of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 263.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.6. Central Basin Municipal Water District [71265. - 71267.]

71265.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “District” means the Central Basin Municipal Water District.

(b) “Large water purveyor” means a public water system that is one of the top five purveyors of water as measured by the total purchase of potable and recycled water from the district for the three prior fiscal years.

(c) “Public water system” has the same meaning as in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Relevant technical expertise” means employment or consulting for a total period of at least five years, prior to the
 date of first appointment, in one or more positions materially responsible for performing services relating to the management, operations, engineering, construction, financing, contracting, regulation, or resource management of a public water system.

(e) “Representative” means a consultant to an entity, a contractor of an entity, or, if nominated by a mutual water company, a member of the governing board of the mutual water company.

(f) “Small water purveyor” means a public water system with less than 5,000 connections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 124, Sec. 1.   (AB 591)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

71266.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) and notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the board of directors of the district shall be composed of seven directors as follows:

(1) Four directors, one director elected for each division established pursuant to subdivision (d) by the voters of the division. Each director shall be a resident of the division from which the director is elected. An election pursuant to this paragraph shall be in accordance with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the
 Elections Code).

(2) Three directors appointed by the water purveyors of the district in accordance with Section 71267. An appointed director shall take office at noon on the first Friday in December following that director’s appointment.

(b) The district shall be subject to Section 84308 of the Government Code.

(c) Until the directors elected at the November 8, 2022, election take office, the board of directors shall be composed of eight directors as follows:

(1) Five directors in accordance with Section 71250.

(2) Three directors appointed by the water purveyors of the district
 pursuant to Section 71267.

(d) The board of directors shall divide the district into four divisions in a manner as to equalize, as nearly as practicable, the population in the respective divisions pursuant to Section 71540.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 124, Sec. 2.   (AB 591)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

71267.

(a) The general manager of the district shall notify each water purveyor of the district and provide a 60-day period during which the district will accept nominations for appointment of individuals to the board of directors.

(b) (1) An individual nominated for appointment to the board of directors shall demonstrate eligibility and relevant technical 
 expertise and shall be employed by or a representative of the entity that puts forth their nomination.

(2) To be eligible for nomination, a consultant to or contractor of an entity shall have commenced services to that entity at least one year prior to nomination.

(c) (1) The three directors appointed by the water purveyors shall be selected by the water purveyors of the district every four years as follows:

(A) One director shall be selected by all large water purveyors from the nominees of large water purveyors. Each large water purveyor shall have one vote.

(B) One director shall be selected by all cities
 that are water purveyors of the district from the nominees of cities. Each city shall have one vote.

(C) One director shall be selected by all of the water purveyors of the district from any nominee. The vote of each purveyor shall be weighted to reflect the number of service connections of that water purveyor within the district. If the selection of a director under this subparagraph would result in a violation of paragraph (2), the first eligible candidate receiving the next highest number of votes shall be selected.

(2) The appointment of directors pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not result in any of the following:

(A) The appointment of three directors that are all employed by or representatives of entities that
 are all large water purveyors.

(B) The appointment of three directors that are all employed by or representatives of entities that are all cities.

(C) The appointment of three directors that are all employed by or representatives of entities that are all small water purveyors.

(3) Each nominee for director who receives the highest number of votes cast for each office described in paragraph (1) is appointed as a director to the board of directors and shall take office in accordance with Section 71512. The general manager shall collect the votes and report the results to the water purveyors. Votes for an appointed director are public records.

(d) Each appointed
 director shall live or work within the district.

(e) In order to ensure continuity of knowledge, the directors appointed at the first purveyor selection shall classify themselves by lot so that two of them shall hold office until the selection of their successors at the first succeeding purveyor selection and one of them shall hold office until the selection of their successor at the second succeeding purveyor selection.

(f) (1) The term of a director appointed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) is terminated if the appointed director no longer is employed by or a representative of a large water purveyor.

(2) The term of a director appointed pursuant to subparagraph (B)
 of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) is terminated if the appointed director no longer is employed by or a representative of a city.

(3) The term of a director appointed pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) is terminated if the appointed director no longer is employed by or a representative of a water purveyor.

(g) (1) An appointed director shall not do any of the following:

(A) Hold an elected office.

(B) Hold more than 0.5 percent ownership in a company regulated by the Public Utilities Commission.

(C) Hold more than one consecutive term of office on
 the board.

(2) An appointed director shall be subject to all applicable conflict-of-interest and ethics provisions and shall recuse
 themselves from participating in a decision that could have a direct material benefit on the financial interests of the director.

(h) A vacancy in an office of appointed director shall be filled in accordance with the selection process described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(i) (1) An appointed director shall be eligible for all of the following:

(A) Reimbursement for travel and conference expenses pursuant to the Central Basin Municipal Water District Administrative Code.

(B) Compensation for up to 10 meetings per month at the per meeting rate provided by the Central Basin Municipal Water District
 Administrative Code.

(C) Health insurance benefits, if those benefits are not provided by the director’s employer.

(2) An appointed director shall not be eligible to receive communication or car allowances. For purposes of this paragraph, “car allowances” does not include travel expenses incurred as described in paragraph (1).

(3) An appointed director may waive the reimbursement and compensation described in paragraph (1) and may be required to reimburse their employer for any compensation received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 124, Sec. 3.   (AB 591)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Board [71270. - 71314.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [71270. - 71282.]

71270.

The board is the governing body of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71271.

The board shall hold its first meeting as soon as possible after the election and certification of the first board of directors and not later than the sixth Monday after the date of the formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71272.

At its first meeting, the board shall provide for the time and place of holding its meetings and the manner in which its special meetings may be called.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71273.

At its first meeting, and at its first meeting in the month of January of each odd-numbered year, the board shall elect one of its members president. The board may at any meeting elect one of its members vice president. If the president is absent or unable to act, the vice president shall exercise the powers of the president granted in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

71274.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; however, no ordinance, motion or resolution shall be passed to become effective without the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71276.

The board shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71277.

On all ordinances the roll shall be called and the ayes and noes recorded in the journal of the proceedings of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71278.

Resolutions and motions may be adopted by voice vote, but on demand of any member of the board the roll shall be called.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71279.

Votes of the members of the board shall not be cast or exercised by proxy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71280.

The enacting clause of all ordinances passed by the board shall be: “Be it ordained by the Board of Directors of ____ Municipal Water District as follows:”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71281.

The board may enact any ordinance which adopts any code by reference following the procedures, definitions and provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 50020) of Chapter 1, Part 1, Division 1, Title 5 of the Government Code so far as they may be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

71282.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.
